Massachusetts, session 194th, S3201.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule or regulation to the 
contrary, the Board of Selectmen of the town of Acushnet may appoint, at the recommendation 
of the chief of police and as the chief of police deems necessary, retired police officers as special 
police officers to perform police details or any police duties arising from police details or during 
the course of police detail work, whether or not related to the detail work. Such retired police 
officers shall have been regular full-time police officers who voluntarily retired based upon 
superannuation. No further deductions shall be made from the regular compensation of such 
retired police officers under chapter 32 of the General Laws for any service subsequent to their 
retirement and, upon retirement, such retired police officers shall receive a superannuation 
retirement allowance equal to that for which they would be entitled to without regard to working 
any police details subsequent to their retirement. Special police officers appointed pursuant to 

of 3 12 this act shall not be subject to the maximum age restrictions applied to regular police officers 
under said chapter 32; provided, however, that such special police officers shall not be eligible to 
serve as special police officers after reaching 70 years of age. Prior to appointment pursuant to 
this act, a special police officer shall provide certification to the town that they are covered by 
personal health insurance and shall pass a medical examination by a physician chosen by the 
town to determine that the officer is capable of performing the essential duties of a special police 
officer, the cost of which shall be borne by the special police officer. 
SECTION 2. Special police officers appointed pursuant to this act shall not be subject to 
chapter 31 of the General Laws, section 99A, 100, 100B, or 111F of chapter 41 of the General 
Laws, or chapter 150E of the General Laws; provided, however, that they shall be subject to 
chapter 151A of the General Laws. A special police officer appointed pursuant to this act shall 
comply with all requirements of chapter 6E of the General Laws, including: (i) maintaining 
certification and good standing with the Massachusetts Peace Officer Standards and Training 
Commission; and (ii) complying with all annual in-service and other training requirements 
mandated by the municipal police training committee. 
SECTION 3. When performing the duties under section 1, special police officers 
appointed pursuant to this act shall have the same power to make arrests and to perform other 
police functions as do regular police officers of the town of Acushnet. 
SECTION 4. Special police officers shall be re-appointed annually, subject to removal by 
the Board of Selectmen at any time with 14 days’ written notice. Upon request, the police chief 
shall provide reasons for removal in writing. 

of 3 33  SECTION 5. Special police officers appointed pursuant to this act shall be subject to the 
rules and regulations, policies, procedures and requirements of the police department and the 
chief of police of the town of Acushnet, including: (i) restrictions on the type of detail 
assignments; (ii) requirements regarding medical examinations to determine continuing 
capability to perform the duties of a special police officer; (iii) requirements for training; (iv) 
requirements for firearms qualifications and licensing; and (v) requirements regarding uniforms 
and equipment; provided, however, that the cost of compliance with all requirements shall be at 
no cost to the town of Acushnet. 
SECTION 6: Special police officers appointed pursuant to this act shall be sworn before 
the town clerk of the town of Acushnet, who shall keep a record of all such appointments. 
SECTION 7: An individual who is appointed as a special police officer pursuant to this 
act shall be eligible for assignment to any detail, subject to the provisions of any collective 
bargaining agreement then in effect in the town of Acushnet between the town of Acushnet and 
the police union. 
SECTION 8: Appointment as a special police officer pursuant to this act shall not entitle 
a special police officer to assignment to any detail. Special police officers shall be paid the detail 
rate applicable to regular full-time officers but shall not be entitled to any other town benefits. 
SECTION 9: Retired police officers serving as special police officers pursuant to this act 
shall be subject to the limitations on hours worked and on payments to retired town employees 
under paragraph (b) of section 91 of chapter 32 of the General Laws. 
SECTION 10. This act shall take effect upon its passage.